src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pt-BR.aff
SFX s   ir       -te           truir
SFX s   ir       -vos          truir
SFX s   ir       a-a           truir
SFX s   ir       a-as          truir
SFX s   ir       a-lhe         truir
SFX s   ir       a-lhes        truir
SFX s   ir       a-me          truir
SFX s   ir       a-nos         truir
SFX s   ir       a-o           truir
SFX s   ir       a-os          truir
SFX s   ir       a-se          truir
SFX s   ir       a-te          truir
SFX s   ir       a-vos         truir
SFX s   ir       am-lhe        truir
SFX s   ir       am-lhes       truir
SFX s   ir       am-me         truir
SFX s   ir       am-na         truir
SFX s   ir       am-nas        truir
SFX s   ir       am-no         truir
SFX s   ir       am-nos        truir
SFX s   ir       am-se         truir
SFX s   ir       am-te         truir
SFX s   ir       am-vos        truir
SFX s   ir       amo-nos       truir
SFX s   ir       amo-vos       truir
SFX s   ir       amos-lhe      truir
SFX s   ir       amos-lhes     truir
SFX s   ir       amos-te       truir
SFX s   ir       do-a          truir
SFX s   ir       do-as         truir
SFX s   ir       do-lhe        truir
SFX s   ir       do-lhes       truir
SFX s   ir       do-me         truir
SFX s   ir       do-nos        truir
SFX s   ir       do-o          truir
SFX s   ir       do-os         truir
SFX s   ir       do-se         truir
SFX s   ir       do-te         truir
SFX s   ir       do-vos        truir
SFX s   ir       mo-nos        truir
SFX s   ir       mo-vos        truir
SFX s   ir       mos-lhe       truir
SFX s   ir       mos-lhes      truir
SFX s   ir       mos-te        truir
SFX s   r       ndo-a          truir
SFX s   r       ndo-as         truir
SFX s   r       ndo-lhe        truir
SFX s   r       ndo-lhes       truir
SFX s   r       ndo-me         truir
SFX s   r       ndo-nos        truir
SFX s   r       ndo-o          truir
SFX s   r       ndo-os         truir
SFX s   r       ndo-se         truir
SFX s   r       ndo-te         truir
SFX s   r       ndo-vos        truir
SFX s   0       -la-           truir
SFX s   0       -las-          truir
SFX s   0       -lhe-          truir
SFX s   0       -lhes-         truir
SFX s   0       -lo-           truir
SFX s   0       -los-          truir
SFX s   0       -me-           truir
SFX s   0       -nos-          truir
SFX s   0       -se-           truir
SFX s   0       -te-           truir
SFX s   0       -vos-          truir
SFX s   ir       ra-a          truir
SFX s   ir       ra-as         truir
SFX s   ir       ra-lhe        truir
SFX s   ir       ra-lhes       truir
SFX s   ir       ra-me         truir
SFX s   ir       ra-nos        truir
SFX s   ir       ra-o          truir
SFX s   ir       ra-os         truir
SFX s   ir       ra-se         truir
SFX s   ir       ra-te         truir
SFX s   ir       ra-vos        truir
SFX s   ir       ram-lhe       truir
SFX s   ir       ram-lhes      truir
SFX s   ir       ram-me        truir
SFX s   ir       ram-na        truir
SFX s   ir       ram-nas       truir
SFX s   ir       ram-no        truir
SFX s   ir       ram-nos       truir
SFX s   ir       ram-se        truir
SFX s   ir       ram-te        truir
SFX s   ir       ram-vos       truir
SFX s   0       -lhe- o        truir
SFX s   0       -lhes- o       truir
SFX s   0       -me- o         truir
SFX s   0       -na- o         truir
SFX s   0       -nas- o        truir
SFX s   0       -no- o         truir
SFX s   0       -nos- o        truir
SFX s   0       -se- o         truir
SFX s   0       -te- o         truir
SFX s   0       -vos- o        truir
SFX s   0       -lhe-ei        truir
SFX s   0       -lhes-ei       truir
SFX s   0       -me-ei         truir
SFX s   0       -nos-ei        truir
SFX s   0       -se-ei         truir
SFX s   0       -te-ei         truir
SFX s   0       -vos-ei        truir
SFX s   ir       rem-lhe       truir
SFX s   ir       rem-lhes      truir
SFX s   ir       rem-me        truir
SFX s   ir       rem-na        truir
SFX s   ir       rem-nas       truir
SFX s   ir       rem-no        truir
SFX s   ir       rem-nos       truir
SFX s   ir       rem-se        truir
SFX s   ir       rem-te        truir
SFX s   ir       rem-vos       truir
SFX s   0       -la-emos       truir
SFX s   0       -las-emos      truir
SFX s   0       -lhe-emos      truir
SFX s   0       -lhes-emos     truir
SFX s   0       -lo-emos       truir
SFX s   0       -los-emos      truir
SFX s   0       -nos-emos      truir
SFX s   0       -te-emos       truir
SFX s   0       -vos-emos      truir
SFX s   0       -lhe-ia        truir
SFX s   0       -lhes-ia       truir
SFX s   0       -me-ia         truir
SFX s   0       -nos-ia        truir
SFX s   0       -se-ia         truir
SFX s   0       -te-ia         truir
SFX s   0       -vos-ia        truir
SFX s   0       -lhe-iam       truir
SFX s   0       -lhes-iam      truir
SFX s   0       -me-iam        truir
SFX s   0       -nos-iam       truir
SFX s   0       -se-iam        truir
SFX s   0       -te-iam        truir
SFX s   0       -vos-iam       truir
SFX s   0        amo-nos       truir
SFX s   0        amo-vos       truir
SFX s   0        amos-lhe      truir
SFX s   0        amos-lhes     truir
SFX s   0        amos-te       truir
SFX s   0       mo-nos         truir
SFX s   0       mo-vos         truir
SFX s   0       mos-lhe        truir
SFX s   0       mos-lhes       truir
SFX s   0       mos-te         truir
SFX s   ir       sse-a         truir
SFX s   ir       sse-as        truir
SFX s   ir       sse-lhe       truir
SFX s   ir       sse-lhes      truir
SFX s   ir       sse-me        truir
SFX s   ir       sse-nos       truir
SFX s   ir       sse-o         truir
SFX s   ir       sse-os        truir
SFX s   ir       sse-se        truir
SFX s   ir       sse-te        truir
SFX s   ir       sse-vos       truir
SFX s   ir       ssem-lhe      truir
SFX s   ir       ssem-lhes     truir
SFX s   ir       ssem-me       truir
SFX s   ir       ssem-na       truir
SFX s   ir       ssem-nas      truir
SFX s   ir       ssem-no       truir
SFX s   ir       ssem-nos      truir
SFX s   ir       ssem-te       truir
SFX s   ir       ssem-vos      truir
SFX s   ir       ste-a         truir
SFX s   ir       ste-as        truir
SFX s   ir       ste-lhe       truir
SFX s   ir       ste-lhes      truir
SFX s   ir       ste-me        truir
SFX s   ir       ste-nos       truir
SFX s   ir       ste-o         truir
SFX s   ir       ste-os        truir
SFX s   ir       ste-se        truir
SFX s   ir       ste-te        truir
SFX s   ir       ste-vos       truir
SFX s   r       u-a            truir
SFX s   r       u-as           truir
SFX s   r       u-lhe          truir
SFX s   r       u-lhes         truir
SFX s   r       u-me           truir
SFX s   r       u-nos          truir
SFX s   r       u-o            truir
SFX s   r       u-os           truir
SFX s   r       u-se           truir
SFX s   r       u-te           truir
SFX s   r       u-vos          truir
SFX s   ir      o-a            truir
SFX s   ir      o-as           truir
SFX s   ir      o-lhe          truir
SFX s   ir      o-lhes         truir
SFX s   ir      o-me           truir
SFX s   ir      o-nos          truir
SFX s   ir      o-o            truir
SFX s   ir      o-os           truir
SFX s   ir      o-se           truir
SFX s   ir      o-te           truir
SFX s   ir      o-vos          truir
SFX s   uir      i-a           truir
SFX s   uir      i-as          truir
SFX s   uir      i-lhe         truir
SFX s   uir      i-lhes        truir
SFX s   uir      i-me          truir
SFX s   uir      i-nos         truir
SFX s   uir      i-o           truir
SFX s   uir      i-os          truir
SFX s   uir      i-se          truir
SFX s   uir      i-te          truir
SFX s   uir      i-vos         truir
SFX s   uir     oem-lhe        truir
SFX s   uir     oem-lhes       truir
SFX s   uir     oem-me         truir
SFX s   uir     oem-na         truir
SFX s   uir     oem-nas        truir
SFX s   uir     oem-no         truir
SFX s   uir     oem-nos        truir
SFX s   uir     oem-te         truir
SFX s   uir     oem-vos        truir
SFX s   uir     oem-se         truir
SFX s   ir      e-a            ergir
SFX s   ir      e-as           ergir
SFX s   ir      e-lhe          ergir
SFX s   ir      e-lhes         ergir
SFX s   ir      e-me           ergir
SFX s   ir      e-nos          ergir
SFX s   ir      e-o            ergir
SFX s   ir      e-os           ergir
SFX s   ir      e-se           ergir
SFX s   ir      e-te           ergir
SFX s   ir      e-vos          ergir
SFX s   ir      em-lhe         ergir
SFX s   ir      em-lhes        ergir
SFX s   ir      em-me          ergir
SFX s   ir      em-na          ergir
SFX s   ir      em-nas         ergir
SFX s   ir      em-no          ergir
SFX s   ir      em-nos         ergir
SFX s   ir      em-se          ergir
SFX s   ir      em-te          ergir
SFX s   ir      em-vos         ergir
SFX s   r       -a             ergir
SFX s   r       -as            ergir
SFX s   r       -lhe           ergir
SFX s   r       -lhes          ergir
SFX s   r       -me            ergir
SFX s   r       -nos           ergir
SFX s   r       -o             ergir
SFX s   r       -os            ergir
SFX s   r       -se            ergir
SFX s   r       -te            ergir
SFX s   r       -vos           ergir
SFX s   r       a-a            ergir
SFX s   r       a-as           ergir
SFX s   r       a-lhe          ergir
SFX s   r       a-lhes         ergir
SFX s   r       a-me           ergir
SFX s   r       a-nos          ergir
SFX s   r       a-o            ergir
SFX s   r       a-os           ergir
SFX s   r       a-se           ergir
SFX s   r       a-te           ergir
SFX s   r       a-vos          ergir
SFX s   r       am-lhe         ergir
SFX s   r       am-lhes        ergir
SFX s   r       am-me          ergir
SFX s   r       am-na          ergir
SFX s   r       am-nas         ergir
SFX s   r       am-no          ergir
SFX s   r       am-nos         ergir
SFX s   r       am-se          ergir
SFX s   r       am-te          ergir
SFX s   r       am-vos         ergir
SFX s   ir       amo-nos       ergir
SFX s   ir       amo-vos       ergir
SFX s   ir       amos-lhe      ergir
SFX s   ir       amos-lhes     ergir
SFX s   ir       amos-te       ergir
SFX s   r       do-a           ergir
SFX s   r       do-as          ergir
SFX s   r       do-lhe         ergir
SFX s   r       do-lhes        ergir
SFX s   r       do-me          ergir
SFX s   r       do-nos         ergir
SFX s   r       do-o           ergir
SFX s   r       do-os          ergir
SFX s   r       do-se          ergir
SFX s   r       do-te          ergir
SFX s   r       do-vos         ergir
SFX s   r       mo-nos         ergir
SFX s   r       mo-vos         ergir
SFX s   r       mos-lhe        ergir
SFX s   r       mos-lhes       ergir
SFX s   r       mos-te         ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-a          ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-as         ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-lhe        ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-lhes       ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-me         ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-nos        ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-o          ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-os         ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-se         ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-te         ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-vos        ergir
SFX s   0       a-a            ergir
SFX s   0       a-as           ergir
SFX s   0       a-lhe          ergir
SFX s   0       a-lhes         ergir
SFX s   0       a-me           ergir
SFX s   0       a-nos          ergir
SFX s   0       a-o            ergir
SFX s   0       a-os           ergir
SFX s   0       a-se           ergir
SFX s   0       a-te           ergir
SFX s   0       a-vos          ergir
SFX s   0       -la-           ergir
SFX s   0       -las-          ergir
SFX s   0       -lhe-          ergir
SFX s   0       -lhes-         ergir
SFX s   0       -lo-           ergir
SFX s   0       -los-          ergir
SFX s   0       -me-           ergir
